Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska23-1909
Subdivisions; petition for survey; expense.

Whenever a majority of the owners of any section or quarter section of land, which has not been subdivided into its legal subdivisions, or owners of a major portion thereof, desire to have said land subdivided, they may petition the county surveyor to make such survey, who, after giving at least ten days' notice to all such owners residing within the county, shall proceed to make the survey. The expense thereof shall be borne by all the owners in proportion to the work done for each, to be apportioned by the surveyor.

Laws 1913, c. 43, § 7, p. 144;

R.S.1913, § 5693;

C.S.1922, § 5023;

C.S.1929, § 26-1609;

R.S.1943, § 23-1909.